Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.102.140

Career and technical education conditional scholarship program.

(1) The career and technical education conditional scholarship program is created. The purpose of the program is to provide financial aid for nonteachers and teachers to obtain necessary certificates and endorsements through any approved route to become career and technical education teachers.

(2) To qualify for the program, an applicant must be:

(a) Accepted into, and maintain enrollment in, a Washington professional educator standards board-approved teacher preparation program; and

(b) Pursuing the necessary certificates and endorsements to teach career and technical education courses.

(3) The office must give priority to applicants who:

(a) Possess a professional license and occupational industry experience applicable to the career and technical education endorsement being pursued; or

(b) Are accepted into an alternative route teacher certification program under RCW 28A.660.020.

(4) Participants are eligible to receive a career and technical education conditional scholarship for up to two academic years.

[ 2019 c 295 s 220.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28A.310.235.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28B.10.033.

Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28B.102.030.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.415.265.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.180.120.